Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.020

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is for the creation of a commission which shall promote and carry on research and administer specific industry service programs, including but not limited to sanitation programs, which will or may benefit the planting, production, harvesting, handling, processing or shipment of tree fruit of this state, which shall collect assessments on tree fruit in this state and which shall coordinate its research efforts with those of other state, federal, or private agencies doing similar research.

[ 1983 c 281 s 1; 1969 c 129 s 2.]